Florida, session 2026, SB1086.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 21 22 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 23 48.193, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 24 48.193âActs subjecting person to jurisdiction of courts of 25 state.â 26 (1)(a)âA person, whether or not a citizen or resident of 27 this state, who personally or through an agent does any of the 28 acts enumerated in this subsection thereby submits himself or 29 herself and, if he or she is a natural person, his or her 30 personal representative to the jurisdiction of the courts of 31 this state for any cause of action arising from any of the 32 following acts: 33 1.âOperating, conducting, engaging in, or carrying on a 34 business or business venture in this state or having an office 35 or agency in this state. 36 2.âCommitting a tortious act within this state. 37 3.âOwning, using, possessing, or holding a mortgage or 38 other lien on any real property within this state. 39 4.âContracting to insure a person, property, or risk 40 located within this state at the time of contracting. 41 5.âWith respect to a proceeding for alimony, child support, 42 or division of property in connection with an action to dissolve 43 a marriage or with respect to an independent action for support 44 of dependents, maintaining a matrimonial domicile in this state 45 at the time of the commencement of this action or, if the 46 defendant resided in this state preceding the commencement of 47 the action, whether cohabiting during that time or not. This 48 paragraph does not change the residency requirement for filing 49 an action for dissolution of marriage. 50 6.âCausing injury to persons or property within this state 51 arising out of an act or omission by the defendant outside this 52 state, if, at or about the time of the injury, either: 53 a.âThe defendant was engaged in solicitation or service 54 activities within this state; or 55 b.âProducts, materials, or things processed, serviced, or 56 manufactured by the defendant anywhere were used or consumed 57 within this state in the ordinary course of commerce, trade, or 58 use. 59 7.âBreaching a contract in this state by failing to perform 60 acts required by the contract to be performed in this state. 61 8.âWith respect to a proceeding for paternity, engaging in 62 the act of sexual intercourse within this state with respect to 63 which a child may have been conceived. 64 9.âEntering into a contract that complies with s. 685.102. 65 10.âProviding health insurance, health maintenance 66 organization coverage, health plan coverage, or travel insurance 67 to: 68 a.âAn employee living in this state; or 69 b.âAn insured patient receiving emergency services from a 70 health care provider licensed in this state. As used in this 71 sub-subparagraph, the term: 72 (I)ââEmergency servicesâ means services necessary to 73 prevent imminent risk to life or limb, according to the Prudent 74 Layperson Standard. The term includes an emergency medical 75 condition as defined in s. 641.47. 76 (II)ââHealth care providerâ includes, but is not limited 77 to, any of the following medical services providers if licensed 78 in this state: 79 (A)âA physician. 80 (B)âA health care facility or hospital. 81 (C)âAn urgent care center. 82 (D)âA ground, water, or air ambulance. 83 Section 2.âSection 627.4423, Florida Statutes, is created 84 to read: 85 627.4423âReimbursement for emergency health care services 86 by health and life insurers.â 87 (1)âThe Legislature hereby finds and declares that 88 emergency health care services rendered by a nonparticipating 89 health care provider constitute a direct, significant, and 90 material benefit to a patientâs insurer. 91 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 92 (a)ââEmergency servicesâ means services necessary to 93 prevent imminent risk to life or limb, according to the Prudent 94 Layperson Standard. The term includes an emergency medical 95 condition as defined in s. 641.47. 96 (b)ââHealth care providerâ includes, but is not limited to, 97 any of the following medical services providers if licensed in 98 this state: 99 1.âA physician. 100 2.âA health care facility or hospital. 101 3.âAn urgent care center. 102 4.âA ground, water, or air ambulance. 103 (c)ââNonparticipating health care providerâ means a health 104 care provider that does not have an express contract with a 105 patientâs insurer. 106 (3)(a)âA health care provider may not collect or attempt to 107 collect from a patient any sum owed by the patientâs insurer for 108 emergency services rendered to the patient. This paragraph 109 applies to any health or life insurer whose policyholder is seen 110 by a health care provider in this state, regardless of whether 111 the insurer is licensed to sell insurance policies in this 112 state. 113 (b)âA nonparticipating health care provider may pursue in 114 court a cause of action in quantum meruit to recover from a 115 patientâs insurer the reasonable value of emergency services 116 rendered to the patient. 117 (c)âThe remedies provided under paragraph (b) are 118 cumulative and not exclusive. 119 (4)âThis section is not intended to regulate any price, 120 route, or service of an air ambulance service provider licensed 121 pursuant to s. 401.251. 122 Section 3.âSection 641.1853, Florida Statutes, is created 123 to read: 124 641.1853âReimbursement for emergency services rendered by 125 nonparticipating health care providers.â 126 (1)âThe Legislature hereby finds and declares that 127 emergency health care services rendered by a nonparticipating 128 health care provider constitute a direct, significant, and 129 material benefit to a patientâs health maintenance organization. 130 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 131 (a)ââEmergency servicesâ means services necessary to 132 prevent imminent risk to life or limb, according to the Prudent 133 Layperson Standard. The term includes an emergency medical 134 condition as defined in s. 641.47. 135 (b)ââHealth care providerâ includes, but is not limited to, 136 any of the following medical services providers if licensed in 137 this state: 138 1.âA physician. 139 2.âA health care facility or hospital. 140 3.âAn urgent care center. 141 4.âA ground, water, or air ambulance. 142 (c)ââNonparticipating health care providerâ means a health 143 care provider that does not have an express contract with a 144 patientâs health maintenance organization. 145 (3)(a)âA health care provider may not collect or attempt to 146 collect from a patient any sum owed by the patientâs health 147 maintenance organization for emergency services rendered to the 148 patient. This paragraph applies to any health maintenance 149 organization whose subscriber is seen by a health care provider 150 in this state, regardless of whether the health maintenance 151 organization is licensed to sell health maintenance contracts in 152 this state. 153 (b)âA nonparticipating health care provider may pursue in 154 court a cause of action in quantum meruit to recover from a 155 patientâs health maintenance organization the reasonable value 156 of emergency services rendered to the patient. 157 (c)âThe remedies provided under paragraph (b) are 158 cumulative and not exclusive. 159 (4)âThis section is not intended to regulate any price, 160 route, or service of an air ambulance service provider licensed 161 pursuant to s. 401.251. 162 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.